Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB565.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 24 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding sections to read:§ 8348.8 . Supplemental annuity commencing 2025. (a) Benefits.--Commencing with the first monthly annuity payment after July 1, 2025, an eligible benefit recipient shall be entitled to receive an additional monthly supplemental annuity from the system. The additional monthly supplemental annuity under this section shall be in addition to the supplemental annuities provided for under sections 8348 (relating to supplemental annuities), 8348.1 (relating to additional supplemental annuities), 8348.2 (relating to further 1234567891011121314151617181920 additional supplemental annuities), 8348.3 (relating to supplemental annuities commencing 1994), 8348.4 (relating to special supplemental postretirement adjustment), 8348.5 (relating to supplemental annuities commencing 1998), 8348.6 (relating to supplemental annuities commencing 2002) , 8348.7 (relating to supplemental annuities commencing 2003) and 8348.9 (relating to supplemental annuity commencing 2026).(b) Amount of additional supplemental annuity.--The amount of the supplemental annuity payable under this section shall be a percentage of the amount of the monthly annuity payment on July 1, 2025, determined on the basis of the most recent effective date of retirement as follows:Most recent effective date Percentage factorof retirementJuly 2, 2000, through July 1, 2001 4.5% July 2, 1999, through July 1, 2000 5% July 2, 1998, through July 1, 1999 5.5% July 2, 1997, through July 1, 1998 6% July 2, 1996, through July 1, 1997 6.5% July 2, 1995, through July 1, 1996 7% July 2, 1994, through July 1, 1995 7.5% July 2, 1993, through July 1, 1994 8% July 2, 1992, through July 1, 1993 8.5% July 2, 1991, through July 1, 1992 9% July 2, 1990, through July 1, 1991 9.5% July 2, 1989, through July 1, 1990 10% July 2, 1988, through July 1, 1989 10.5% July 2, 1987, through July 1, 1988 11% July 2, 1986, through July 1, 1987 11.5% July 2, 1985, through July 1, 1986 12% 20250SB0565PN0578 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 July 2, 1984, through July 1, 1985 12.5% July 2, 1983, through July 1, 1984 13% July 2, 1982, through July 1, 1983 13.5% Prior to July 2, 1982 14% (c) Payment.--The supplemental annuity provided under this section shall be paid automatically unless the annuitant files a written notice with the board requesting that the additional monthly supplemental annuity not be paid.(d) Conditions.--The supplemental annuity provided under this section shall be payable under the same terms and conditions as provided under the option plan in effect as of July 1, 2025, and shall be subject to any subsequent modification of that option plan.(e) Benefits to beneficiaries or survivors.--No supplemental annuity provided under this section shall be payable to the beneficiary or survivor annuitant of a member who dies before July 1, 2025.(f) Funding.--(1) The additional liability for the increase in benefits provided under this section shall be funded in equal dollar annual installments over a period of 10 years beginning July 1, 2026.(2) The additional liability for the increase in benefits provided under this section shall be paid by the Commonwealth. A school district of any class, intermediate unit or an area career and technical school under the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, shall not be liable for the increase in benefits provided under this section.(g) Eligible benefit recipient.--20250SB0565PN0578 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) An eligible benefit recipient is an individual:(i) who is receiving a superannuation, withdrawal or disability annuity on July 1, 2025;(ii) whose most recent effective date of retirement is prior to July 2, 2001; and(iii) whose credited service does not include any service credited as either Class T-D, Class D-4 or Class AA service.(2) A supplemental annuity provided under this section shall not be payable to an annuitant receiving a withdrawal annuity prior to the first day of July coincident with or following the annuitant's attainment of superannuation age.§ 8348.9. Supplemental annuity commencing 2026.(a) Benefits.--Commencing with the first monthly annuity payment after July 1, 2026, any eligible benefit recipient shall be entitled to receive an additional monthly supplemental annuity from the system. This shall be in addition to the supplemental annuities provided for in sections 8348 (relating to supplemental annuities), 8348.1 (relating to additional supplemental annuities), 8348.2 (relating to further additional supplemental annuities), 8348.3 (relating to supplemental annuities commencing 1994), 8348.4 (relating to special supplemental postretirement adjustment), 8348.5 (relating to supplemental annuities commencing 1998), 8348.6 (relating to supplemental annuities commencing 2002), 8348.7 (relating to supplemental annuities commencing 2003) and 8348.8 (relating to supplemental annuity commencing 2025).(b) Amount of supplemental annuity.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), the amount of the supplemental annuity payable under this section shall 20250SB0565PN0578 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 be equal to the average percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area during the prior calendar year. The supplemental annuity payable under this section shall apply with the first monthly annuity payment after July 1, 2026, and shall be adjusted every three years thereafter in accordance with the average percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area during the prior calendar year.(2) The amount of the supplemental annuity payable under this section and calculated under paragraph (1) may not exceed 7% of the amount of the monthly annuity payment or be less than 1% of the amount of the monthly annuity payment after July 1, 2026.(c) Payment.--The supplemental annuity provided under this section shall be paid automatically unless the annuitant files a written notice with the board requesting that the additional monthly supplemental annuity not be paid.(d) Conditions.--The supplemental annuity provided under this section shall be payable under the same terms and conditions as provided under the option plan in effect as of July 1, 2026.(e) Benefits to beneficiaries or survivors.--No supplemental annuity provided under this section shall be payable to the beneficiary or survivor annuitant of a member who dies before July 1, 2026.(f) Funding.--(1) The additional liability for the increase in benefits provided under this section shall be funded in equal 20250SB0565PN0578 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 dollar annual installments over a period of 10 years beginning July 1, 2027.(2) The additional liability for the increase in benefits provided under this section shall be paid by the Commonwealth. A school district of any class, intermediate unit or an area career and technical school under the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, shall not be liable for the increase in benefits provided under this section.(g) Eligible benefit recipient.--(1) An eligible benefit recipient is an individual:(i) who is receiving a superannuation, withdrawal or disability annuity on July 1, 2026; and(ii) whose credited service does not include any service credited as either Class T-D, Class D-4 or Class AA service.(2) A supplemental annuity provided under this section shall not be payable to an annuitant receiving a withdrawal annuity prior to the first day of July coincident with or following the annuitant's attainment of superannuation age.Section 2. Title 71 is amended by adding sections to read:§ 5708.9. Supplemental annuity commencing 2025.(a) Benefits.--Commencing with the first monthly annuity payment after January 1, 2026, an eligible benefit recipient shall be entitled to receive an additional monthly supplemental annuity from the system. The additional monthly supplemental annuity under this section shall be in addition to the supplemental annuities provided for under sections 5708 (relating to supplemental annuities), 5708.1 (relating to additional supplemental annuities), 5708.2 (relating to further 20250SB0565PN0578 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 additional supplemental annuities), 5708.3 (relating to supplemental annuities commencing 1994), 5708.4 (relating to special supplemental postretirement adjustment), 5708.5 (relating to supplemental annuities commencing 1998), 5708.6 (relating to supplemental annuities commencing 2002), 5708.7 (relating to supplemental annuities commencing 2003), 5708.8 (relating to special supplemental postretirement adjustment of 2002) and 5708.10 (relating to supplemental annuity commencing 2026).(b) Amount of additional supplemental annuity.--The amount of the supplemental annuity under this section shall be a percentage of the amount of the monthly annuity payment on January 1, 2025, determined on the basis of the most recent effective date of retirement as follows:Most recent effective date Percentage factorof retirementJuly 2, 2000, through July 1, 2001 4.5%July 2, 1999, through July 1, 2000 5%July 2, 1998, through July 1, 1999 5.5%July 2, 1997, through July 1, 1998 6%July 2, 1996, through July 1, 1997 6.5%July 2, 1995, through July 1, 1996 7%July 2, 1994, through July 1, 1995 7.5%July 2, 1993, through July 1, 1994 8%July 2, 1992, through July 1, 1993 8.5%July 2, 1991, through July 1, 1992 9%July 2, 1990, through July 1, 1991 9.5%July 2, 1989, through July 1, 1990 10%July 2, 1988, through July 1, 1989 10.5%July 2, 1987, through July 1, 1988 11%20250SB0565PN0578 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 July 2, 1986, through July 1, 1987 11.5%July 2, 1985, through July 1, 1986 12%July 2, 1984, through July 1, 1985 12.5%July 2, 1983, through July 1, 1984 13%July 2, 1982, through July 1, 1983 13.5%Prior to July 2, 1982 14%(c) Payment.--The supplemental annuity provided under this section shall be paid automatically unless the annuitant files a written notice with the board requesting that the additional monthly supplemental annuity not be paid.(d) Conditions.--The supplemental annuity provided under this section shall be payable under the same terms and conditions as provided under the option plan in effect as of January 1, 2025, and shall be subject to any subsequent modification of that option plan.(e) Benefits to beneficiaries or survivors.--No supplemental annuity provided under this section shall be payable to the beneficiary or survivor annuitant of a member who dies before January 1, 2025.(f) Funding.--The additional liability for the increase in benefits provided under this section shall be funded in equal dollar annual installments over a period of 10 years beginning July 1, 2025.(g) Eligible benefit recipient.--(1) An eligible benefit recipient is an individual:(i) who is receiving a superannuation, withdrawal or disability annuity on January 1, 2025;(ii) whose most recent effective date of retirement is prior to July 2, 2001; and(iii) whose credited service does not include any 20250SB0565PN0578 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 service credited as either Class T-D, Class D-4 or Class AA service.(2) A supplemental annuity provided under this section shall not be payable to an annuitant receiving a withdrawal annuity prior to the first day of July coincident with or following the annuitant's attainment of superannuation age.§ 5708.10. Supplemental annuity commencing 2026.(a) Benefits.--Commencing with the first monthly annuity payment after January 1, 2027, an eligible benefit recipient shall be entitled to receive an additional monthly supplemental annuity from the system. The additional monthly supplemental annuity under this section shall be in addition to the supplemental annuities provided for under sections 5708 (relating to supplemental annuities), 5708.1 (relating to additional supplemental annuities), 5708.2 (relating to further additional supplemental annuities), 5708.3 (relating to supplemental annuities commencing 1994), 5708.4 (relating to special supplemental postretirement adjustment), 5708.5 (relating to supplemental annuities commencing 1998), 5708.6 (relating to supplemental annuities commencing 2002), 5708.7 (relating to supplemental annuities commencing 2003) , 5708.8 (relating to special supplemental postretirement adjustment of 2002) and 5708.9 (relating to supplemental annuity commencing 2025) . (b) Amount of supplemental annuity.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), the amount of the supplemental annuity under this section shall be equal to the average percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area during the prior 20250SB0565PN0578 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 calendar year. The supplemental annuity under this section shall apply with the first monthly annuity payment after January 1, 2027, and shall be adjusted every three years thereafter in accordance with the average percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area during the prior calendar year.(2) The amount of the supplemental annuity under this section and calculated under paragraph (1) may not exceed 7% of the amount of the monthly annuity payment or be less than 1% of the amount of the monthly annuity payment after January 1, 2027.(c) Payment.--The supplemental annuity provided under this section shall be paid automatically unless the annuitant files a written notice with the board requesting that the additional monthly supplemental annuity not be paid.(d) Conditions.--The supplemental annuity provided under this section shall be payable under the same terms and conditions as provided under the option plan in effect as of January 1, 2027, and shall be subject to any subsequent modification of that option plan.(e) Benefits to beneficiaries or survivors.--No supplemental annuity provided under this section shall be payable to the beneficiary or survivor annuitant of a member who dies before January 1, 2027.(f) Funding.--The additional liability for the increase in benefits provided under this section shall be funded in equal dollar annual installments over a period of 10 years beginning July 1, 2027.(g) Eligible benefit recipient.--20250SB0565PN0578 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) An eligible benefit recipient is an individual:(i) who is receiving a superannuation, withdrawal or disability annuity on January 1, 2027; and(ii) whose credited service does not include any service credited as either Class T-D, Class D-4 or Class AA service.(2) A supplemental annuity provided under this section shall not be payable to an annuitant receiving a withdrawal annuity prior to the first day of July coincident with or following the annuitant's attainment of superannuation age.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0565PN0578 - 11 - 1234567891011